Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5788YH (3) 91 ms/js H.F. 2300 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 335.2B Hemp production ââ 1 limitation. 2 A county shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance under this 3 chapter to regulate, restrict, or prohibit the location of hemp 4 production by a USDA licensee as defined in section 204A.2 in 5 any location zoned for commercial or industrial purposes. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 414.34 Hemp production ââ limitation. 7 A city shall not adopt or enforce any regulation or 8 restriction under this chapter to regulate, restrict, or 9 prohibit the location of hemp production by a USDA licensee as 10 defined in section 204A.2 in any location zoned for commercial 11 or industrial purposes. 12